Utah statutes.
10-6-114.   Budget -- Public hearing on tentatively adopted budget.

At the time and place advertised, or at any time and place to which the public hearing may be adjourned, the governing body shall hold a public hearing on the budgets tentatively adopted. All interested persons in attendance shall be given an opportunity to be heard, for or against, the estimates of revenue and expenditures or any item thereof in the tentative budget of any fund.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

